Utah statutes.
53B-16-405.   Recognition of participation in internship program.

A cooperating employer may be given appropriate recognition by an institution of higher education, including the posting of the employer's name and a short description of the employer's business in an appropriate location on the institution's property, or publication of that information in official publications of the institution.



Enacted by Chapter 73, 1996 General Session

